Montana, session 2025, HB861.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Appropriation. (1) The following money is appropriated from the general fund to provide
statewide access to a K-12 digital toolkit that provides state standards-aligned, multimodal instructional
materials across all content areas, including access to career and technical educational materials and local
Montana industry partners to support workforce development:
(a) for fiscal year 2026:
(i) $1.1 million to the office of public instruction; and
(ii) $750,000 to the department of labor and industry; and
(b) for fiscal year 2027:
(i) $1.1 million to the office of public instruction; and
(ii) $750,000 to the department of labor and industry.
(2) The legislature intends that the appropriations in this section be considered part of the ongoing
base for the next legislative session.
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
Section 3. Termination. [This act] terminates June 30, 2029.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 861
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 861, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 861
INTRODUCED BY E. TILLEMAN, M. NIKOLAKAKOS, L. REKSTEN, M. ROMANO
AN ACT APPROPRIATING MONEY TO PROVIDE STATEWIDE ACCESS TO A K-12 DIGITAL TOOLKIT;
PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE AND A TERMINATION DATE.”